Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.672

Veterans' in-state service shared leave pool.

(1) The veterans' in-state service shared leave pool is created to allow employees to donate leave to be used as shared leave for:

(a) Veteran employees who meet the requirements of RCW 41.04.665; or

(b) Spouses of veteran employees, who meet the requirements of RCW 41.04.665, who are caring for their spouses.

(2) Participation in the pool shall, at all times, be voluntary on the part of the employee. The department of veterans affairs shall administer the veterans' in-state service shared leave pool.

(3) Employees who are eligible to donate leave under RCW 41.04.665 may donate leave to the veterans' in-state service shared leave pool.

(4) A veteran employee who is eligible for shared leave under RCW 41.04.665 or a spouse of a veteran employee, who is eligible for shared leave under RCW 41.04.665, who is caring for his or her spouse may request shared leave from veterans' in-state service shared leave pool.

(5) Shared leave under this section may not be granted unless the pool has a sufficient balance to fund the requested shared leave.

(6) Shared leave paid under this section, in combination with an employees's salary, may not exceed the level of the employee's state monthly salary.

(7) Any leave donated must be removed from the personally accumulated leave balance of the employee donating the leave.

(8) All employees who donate to the shared leave pool must specify their intent to donate to the veterans' in-state service shared leave pool.

(9) An employee who receives shared leave from the pool is not required to recontribute such leave to the pool, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(10) Leave that may be donated or received by any one employee must be calculated as in RCW 41.04.665.

(11) As used in this section:

(a) "Employee" has the meaning provided in RCW 41.04.655, except that "employee" as used in this section does not include employees of school districts and educational service districts. "Employee" does not include employees called to service in the uniformed services.

(b) "Monthly salary" includes monthly salary and special pay and shift differential, or the monthly equivalent for hourly employees. "Monthly salary" does not include:

(i) Overtime pay;

(ii) Call back pay;

(iii) Standby pay; or

(iv) Performance bonuses.

(c) "Service in the uniformed services" has the meaning provided in RCW 41.04.655.

(d) "Veteran" has the meaning provided in RCW 41.04.005.

(12) The office of financial management, in consultation with the department of veterans affairs, shall adopt rules and policies governing the donation and use of shared leave from the veterans' in-state service shared leave pool, including definitions of pay and allowances and guidelines for agencies to use in recordkeeping concerning shared leave.

(13) Agencies shall investigate any alleged abuse of the veterans' in-state service shared leave pool and on a finding of wrongdoing, the employee may be required to repay all of the shared leave received from the veterans' in-state service shared leave pool.

(14) Higher education institutions shall adopt policies consistent with the needs of the employees under their respective jurisdictions.

[ 2017 c 173 s 2.]